Hawaii statutes.
[§486N-5] Contents of contracts. In
addition to all other requirements of this chapter, every health club contract
shall include the following:

(1) The name and address of the health club;

(2) The name and address of the buyer; and

(3) A list of the names and addresses of other clubs,
if the contract is transferable for use at other facilities. [L 1984, c 161, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next